Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 5
OTHER CREDIT TRANSACTIONS

5-2-501. Transactions subject to code by agreement of parties.

The parties to a transaction other than a consumer credit transaction may agree in a writing signed by the parties that the transaction is subject to the provisions of this code. If the parties so agree, the transaction is a consumer credit transaction for the purposes of this code.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-601, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-502. Finance charge for other transactions.

With respect to a transaction that is specifically exempt from the rate ceilings of this code by the provisions of section 5-1-301 (15)(c), the parties may contract for the payment by the consumer of any finance charge up to a rate not to exceed an annual percentage rate of forty-five percent pursuant to section 18-15-104, C.R.S. The rate of the finance charge shall be calculated on the unpaid balances of the debt on the assumption that the debt will be paid according to its terms and will not be paid before the end of the agreed term.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1214, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-605, as it existed prior to 2000.